Colorado, session 2026A, HB1079.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Cole
Bradley Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(a) Motorcycles inherently provide significantly less occupant
protection than passenger motor vehicles, leaving operators and passengers
fully exposed to impact forces in the event of a crash, loss of control, or
roadway hazard;
(b) In 2024, the state of Colorado recorded 165 motorcycle fatalities,
which is the highest number of motorcycle deaths in state history and
represents a 57% increase since 2015;
(c) In 2024, motorcycle fatalities accounted for approximately 24%
of all traffic fatalities in Colorado, despite motorcycles comprising only
approximately 3% of registered vehicles statewide, demonstrating a
disproportionate risk of death associated with motorcycle operation;
(d) State crash data for 2024 indicate that approximately 80% of
motorcycle crashes resulted in injury, with injuries frequently involving
traumatic brain injury, spinal trauma, or permanent disability;
(e) Minors are particularly vulnerable to motorcycle-related injuries
and fatalities due to ongoing physical, neurological, and cognitive
development, including limitations in hazard recognition, risk assessment,
judgment, and reaction time;
(f) Colorado law currently recognizes the heightened vulnerability
of minors by requiring helmet use for motorcycle operators and passengers
under 18 years old; however, protective equipment alone does not
sufficiently mitigate the inherent risks of motorcycle operation by minors;
(g) A substantial number of motorcycle fatalities in Colorado
involve riders not wearing helmets, and, even when helmets are worn,
minors remain at elevated risk due to the absence of structural protections
on motorcycles;
(h) Colorado's high-speed roadways, mountainous terrain, variable
weather conditions, and increasing traffic congestion further increase the
dangers associated with motorcycle operation, particularly for young and
inexperienced riders;
(i) Permitting minors to obtain motorcycle endorsements or operate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1079

motorcycles based solely on consent from any individual over 21 years old
does not adequately ensure responsible oversight, informed
decision-making, or appropriate evaluation of a minor's readiness to safely
operate a motorcycle;
(j) Requiring parental or legal guardian consent:
(I) Provides a higher level of accountability;
(II) Aligns motorcycle endorsement requirements with Colorado's
existing youth safety frameworks; and
(III) Helps ensure that minors receive appropriate training,
supervision, and assessment prior to operating motorcycles on public
roadways;
(k) Motorcycle-related injuries and fatalities involving minors
impose significant emotional and financial burdens on families and
substantial costs to the state through emergency medical response,
long-term medical care, rehabilitation, and disability support services; and
(l) The state of Colorado has a compelling interest in protecting the
health, safety, and welfare of minors and, in high-risk activities, has long
exercised its authority to impose age-based safety requirements, including
graduated driver licensing systems and child passenger safety laws.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is necessary and
appropriate to enact legislation regulating motorcycle operation and
endorsement eligibility involving minors, including consent and training
requirements, in order to protect Colorado's youth.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-106 as it will
become effective April 1, 2026, add (1)(f) as follows:
42-2-106. Instruction permits and temporary licenses - penalty.
(1) (f) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT ISSUE AN INSTRUCTION PERMIT TO A MINOR WHO
IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD TO DRIVE A MOTORCYCLE UNLESS THE MINOR
HAS WRITTEN PERMISSION OF THE MINOR'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN TO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1079

DRIVE A MOTORCYCLE. THE WRITTEN PERMISSION REQUIREMENT IN THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(f) DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EMANCIPATED MINOR.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1079

(2) This act applies to applications for instruction permits submitted
on or after the applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1079